Utah statutes.
20A-8-401.   Registered political parties -- Bylaws.
(1) (a)  Each registered state political party shall file a copy of its
constitution and bylaws with the lieutenant governor by January 1, 1995.
(b)  Each new or unregistered state political party that seeks to become a
registered political party under the authority of this chapter shall file a
copy of its proposed constitution and bylaws at the time it files its
registration information.
(c)  Each registered state political party shall file revised copies of its
constitution or bylaws with the lieutenant governor within 15 days after the
constitution or bylaws are adopted or amended.
(2)  Each state political party, each new political party seeking
registration, and each unregistered political party seeking registration shall
ensure that its constitution or bylaws contain:
(a)  provisions establishing party organization, structure, membership, and
governance that include:
(i)  a description of the position, selection process, qualifications, duties,
and terms of each party officer and committees defined by constitution and
bylaws;
(ii)  a provision requiring a designated party officer to serve as liaison
with the lieutenant governor on all matters relating to the political party's
relationship with the state;
(iii)  a description of the requirements for participation in party processes;
(iv)  the dates, times, and quorum of any regularly scheduled party meetings,
conventions, or other conclaves; and
(v)  a mechanism for making the names of delegates, candidates, and elected
party officers available to the public shortly after they are selected;
(b)  a procedure for selecting party officers that allows active participation
by party members;
(c)  a procedure for selecting party candidates at the federal, state, and
county levels that allows active participation by party members;
(d) (i)  a procedure for selecting electors who are pledged to cast their
votes in the electoral college for the party's candidates for president and
vice president of the United States; and
(ii)  a procedure for filling vacancies in the office of presidential elector
because of death, refusal to act, failure to attend, ineligibility, or any
other cause;
(e)  a procedure for filling vacancies in the office of representative or
senator because of death, resignation, or ineligibility;
(f)  a provision requiring the governor and lieutenant governor to run as a
joint ticket;
(g)  a procedure for replacing party candidates who die, become disabled, or
are disqualified before a primary or regular general election;
(h)  provisions governing the deposit and expenditure of party funds, and
governing the accounting for, reporting, and audit of party financial
transactions;
(i)  provisions governing access to party records;
(j)  a procedure for amending the constitution or bylaws that allows active
participation by party members or their representatives;
(k)  a process for resolving grievances against the political party; and
(l)  if desired by the political party, a process for consulting with, and
obtaining the opinion of, the political party's Utah Senate and Utah House
members about:
(i)  the performance of the two United States Senators from Utah, including
specifically:
(A)  their views and actions regarding the defense of state's rights and
federalism; and
(B)  their performance in representing Utah's interests;
(ii)  the members' opinion about, or rating of, and support or opposition to
the policy positions of any candidates for United States Senate from Utah,
including incumbents, including specifically:
(A)  their views and actions regarding the defense of state's rights and
federalism; and
(B)  their performance in representing Utah's interests; and
(iii)  the members' collective or individual endorsement or rating of a
particular candidate for United States Senate from Utah.
